District of Columbia statutes.
26-602

Repealed

Establishment of special account.

Repealed.

Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 1803, 44 DCR 7378
Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1902(b), 45 DCR 7193
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 25, 46 DCR 2118
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 36, 52 DCR 2638
1981 Ed., § 26-802.3.
Sections 1802 through 1804 of D.C. Law 12-59 added §§ 26-802.3 and 26-802.4 [1981 Ed.].
Section 2001(b) of D.C. Law 12-59 provided the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary addition of §§  26-802.3 and 26-802.4 [1981 Ed.], see §§ 1802 to 1804 of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-152, October 17, 1997, 44 DCR 6196) and §§ 1802 to 1804 of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-239, January 13, 1998, 45 DCR 508).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 1502(b) of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-401, July 13, 1998, 45 DCR 4794), and § 1502(b) of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-564, January 12, 1999, 46 DCR 669).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 1502(b) of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-41, March 31, 1999, 46 DCR 3446).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 1502(c) of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-41, March 31, 1999, 46 DCR 3446).

Application of Law 12-60: Section 2002 of D.C. Law 12-60 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 1997.

Application of D.C. Law 12-175: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 26-601.